Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 12. Sale of Assets.

§79-4-12.01.
Disposition of assets not requiring shareholder approval.

No approval of the shareholders of a corporation is required, unless the articles of incorporation otherwise provide:

To sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any or all of the corporation’s assets in the usual and regular course of business;

To mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness (whether with or without recourse) or otherwise encumber any or all of the corporation’s assets, whether or not in the usual and regular course of business;

To transfer any or all of the corporation’s assets to one or more corporations or other entities all of the shares or interests of which are owned by the corporation; or

To distribute assets pro rata to the holders of one or more classes or series of the corporation’s shares.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 12.01; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

Disposition of assets requiring shareholder approval, see § 79-4-12.02.

Disposition of corporation assets under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-329, 79-11-331.

Deeds of trust and security agreement, taken together, and which mortgaged to plaintiff all or substantially all of the property of the corporation were invalid under Mississippi law where: (1) they were not made in the regular corporation course of business; (2) the mortgage was not a purchase money mortgage except as to supplies subsequently delivered; (3) corporation was not in the business of buying and selling real estate or business equipment; (4) no notice of the mortgage was given to the shareholders; and (5) there was no meeting of the stockholders authorizing or consenting to the mortgage. In re James Calvin Belk Constr. Co., 4 B.R. 132, 1980 Bankr. LEXIS 5278 (Bankr. N.D. Miss. 1980).

Applicability of statutes regulating sale of assets or property of corporation as affected by purpose or character of corporation.
9 A.L.R.2d 1306.

Right of corporate officer to purchase corporate assets from corporation.
24 A.L.R.2d 71.

Who may assert invalidity of sale, mortgage, or other disposition of corporate property without approval of stockholders.
58 A.L.R.2d 784.

Right or duty of corporation to refuse to transfer stock on presentation of properly indorsed certificate, because of conflicting rights or claims of one other than transferee.
75 A.L.R.2d 746.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1791,
1792.

16 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Sale of Business §§ 226:202 et seq. (sale of corporate assets).

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1102.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-12.02.
Disposition of assets requiring shareholder approval.

A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of assets, other than a disposition described in Section 79-4-12.01, requires approval of the corporation’s shareholders if the disposition would leave the corporation without a significant continuing business activity. If a corporation retains a business activity that represented at least twenty-five percent (25%) of total assets at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year, and twenty-five (25%) of either income from continuing operations before taxes or revenues from continuing operations for that fiscal year, in each case of the corporation and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the corporation will conclusively be deemed to have retained a significant continuing business activity.

A disposition that requires approval of the shareholders under subsection (a) shall be initiated by a resolution by the board of directors authorizing the disposition. After adoption of such a resolution, the board of directors shall submit the proposed disposition to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors shall also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the proposed disposition, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors shall transmit to the shareholders the basis for that determination.

The board of directors may condition its submission of a disposition to the shareholders under subsection (b) on any basis.

If a disposition is required to be approved by the shareholders under subsection (a), and if the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which the disposition is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the disposition and shall contain a description of the disposition, including the terms and conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by the corporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c) require a greater vote, or a greater number of votes to be present, the approval of a disposition by the shareholders shall require the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the disposition exists.

After a disposition has been approved by the shareholders under subsection (b), and at any time before the disposition has been consummated, it may be abandoned by the corporation without action by the shareholders, subject to any contractual rights of other parties to the disposition.

A disposition of assets in the course of dissolution under Title 79, Chapter 4, Article 14 is not governed by this section.

The assets of a direct or indirect consolidated subsidiary shall be deemed the assets of the parent corporation for the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 12.02; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

Disposition of assets not requiring shareholder approval, see § 79-4-12.01.

Dissolution generally, Title 79, Chapter 4, Article 14, see §§ 79-4-14.01 through 79-4-14.40.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Disposition of corporation assets under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-329, 79-11-331.

A corporate obligor and those who control it may not with impunity dissolve the corporation in a debt avoidance maneuver and cause its assets to be transferred to a new successor corporation. This is so whether the debt arises in contract, quasi-contract, or tort. Where a corporation unsuccessfully sought to avoid liability on a contract with a former shareholder by dissolving the corporation and transferring assets to a newly formed corporation, the shareholder’s rights against the new corporation were limited to the extent that the new corporation acquired assets of the contracting corporation without paying fair value therefor. Morris v. Macione, 546 So. 2d 969, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 319 (Miss. 1989).

Deeds of trust and security agreement, taken together, and which mortgaged to plaintiff all or substantially all of the property of the corporation were invalid under Mississippi law where: (1) they were not made in the regular corporation course of business; (2) the mortgage was not a purchase money mortgage except as to supplies subsequently delivered; (3) corporation was not in the business of buying and selling real estate or business equipment; (4) no notice of the mortgage was given to the shareholders; and (5) there was no meeting of the stockholders authorizing or consenting to the mortgage. In re James Calvin Belk Constr. Co., 4 B.R. 132, 1980 Bankr. LEXIS 5278 (Bankr. N.D. Miss. 1980).

Applicability of statutes regulating sale of assets or property of corporation as affected by purpose or character of corporation.
9 A.L.R.2d 1306.

Right of corporate officer to purchase corporate assets from corporation.
24 A.L.R.2d 71.

Who may assert invalidity of sale, mortgage, or other disposition of corporate property without approval of stockholders.
58 A.L.R.2d 784.

Validity of agreement in conjunction with sale of corporate shares that majority of directors will be replaced by purchaser’s designees. 13 A.L.R.3d 361.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1791 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 441 et seq.

5 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 505, Good Will.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1102.